Washington statutes.
RCW 35.97.050

Heating systems—Authorized by legislative authority of municipality—Competitive bidding.

If the legislative authority of a municipality deems it advisable that the municipality purchase, acquire, or construct a heating system, or make any additions or extensions to a heating system, the legislative authority shall so provide by an ordinance or a resolution specifying and adopting the system or plan proposed, declaring the estimated cost thereof, as near as may be, and specifying the method of financing and source of funds. Any construction, alteration, or improvement of a heating system by any municipality shall be in compliance with the appropriate competitive bidding requirements in Titles 35, 36, 53, 57, or 87 RCW.

[ 1999 c 153 s 42; 1996 c 230 s 1603; 1983 c 216 s 5.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.

Part headings not law—Effective date—1996 c 230: See notes following RCW 57.02.001.